District of Columbia statutes.
29-1207.03

Action on plan of merger by constituent statutory trust.

(a)

A plan of merger shall be consented to by all trustees and all beneficial owners of a constituent statutory trust.

(b)

After a merger is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under § 29-1207.04, a constituent statutory trust may amend the plan or abandon the planned merger:

(1)

As provided in the plan; and

(2)

Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1207.02.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 703 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.